California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 order the licensee to pay the board the reasonable costs of the investigation and adjudication of the case. For purposes of this section, “costs” include charges by the board for investigating the case, charges incurred by the office of the Attorney General for investigating and presenting the case, and charges incurred by the Office of Administrative Hearings for hearing the case and issuing a proposed decision.

(g) The costs to be assessed shall be fixed by the administrative law judge and shall not, in any event, be increased by the board. When the board does not adopt a proposed decision and remands the case to an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall not increase the amount of any costs assessed in the proposed decision.

(h) The board may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county where the administrative hearing was held. This
 right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee directed to pay costs.

(i) In any judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the board’s contingent fund as a scheduled reimbursement in the fiscal year in which the costs are actually recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 16.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the executive officer or his or her designee, pursuant to an inspection of an establishment where health and safety laws and regulations related to manicure and pedicure equipment have been violated and a citation issued, may, without advance hearing, suspend temporarily a license issued under this chapter if, in the opinion of the executive officer or his or her designee, the action is necessary to protect the public’s health and safety. The suspension shall be effective upon the executive officer or his or her designee providing written notice of the suspension to the licensee.

(b) The suspension of a license pursuant to this section shall be immediately stayed. The license shall be placed on probation for one year from the date of the suspension and be subject to the following terms and conditions:

(1) The licensee shall undertake board-approved remedial training related to the health and safety laws and regulations applicable to the establishment.

(2) The licensee shall be subject to reinspection by the board. The owner of the establishment shall pay all costs of inspection.

(3) The licensee shall pay all citation fines to the board. In cases of economic hardship, the licensee may enter into an agreement with the board to make periodic payments to pay the citation fine amount.

(c) The licensee whose license was suspended under this section may appeal in writing to the disciplinary review committee to determine if the suspension and the probationary terms and conditions should be modified or set aside. The appeal shall be submitted to the committee within 30 days of the effective date of the license suspension. An appeal not submitted within that timeframe shall be rejected by the committee. The appeal shall be conducted pursuant to the process described in Section 7410. The licensee may appeal the decision of the committee to the program administrator pursuant to the process described in Section 7411.

(d) If the licensee fails to comply with the probationary terms and conditions imposed under this section, the board may petition to revoke the licensee’s probation. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) Upon the licensee’s successful completion of the probationary terms and conditions, the board shall reinstate the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.5.

(a) In addition to the authority provided by Sections 494 and 7403, the executive officer, in his or her discretion, may upon written notice immediately close any establishment which, upon completion of an inspection, is found to have health and safety violations of such a severe nature as to pose an immediate threat to public health and safety.

(b) The executive officer shall issue a written notice of suspension of the establishment license including the grounds therefor and a notice of closure. The notice of closure shall be posted at the establishment so as to be clearly visible to the general public and to patrons.

(c) Upon issuance of the written notice of suspension of the establishment license, the establishment shall immediately close to the general public and to patrons and shall discontinue all operations until the suspension has been vacated by the executive officer, the suspension expires, is superseded by an order issued under the authority of Section 494, or until the establishment no longer operates under this chapter.

(d) (1) Before issuing a suspension order under this section, the executive officer shall, if practical, give the establishment notice and an opportunity to be heard. If no hearing is provided prior to the issuance of the suspension order, the establishment may request one after the suspension has been issued.

(2) Notice and hearing under this section may be oral or written, including notice and hearing by telephone, facsimile transmission, or other electronic means as the circumstances permit.

(e) Upon correction of violations the establishment may request that the written notice of suspension be terminated. The executive officer shall conduct an inspection within 48 hours to determine whether the written notice of suspension may be terminated. If the written notice of suspension is not terminated upon inspection for failure of the establishment to correct violations, a charge of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be imposed for each subsequent inspection under this section.

(f) The notice of suspension shall remain posted until removed by the executive officer, but shall be in effect for no longer than 30 days. Removal of the notice of suspension by any person other than the executive officer or designated representative, or the refusal of an establishment to close upon issuance of the written notice of suspension of the establishment license is a violation of this chapter and may result in any sanctions authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

The grounds for disciplinary action are as follows:

(a) Unprofessional conduct which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Incompetence or gross negligence, including failure to comply with generally accepted standards for the practice of barbering, cosmetology, or electrology or disregard for the health and safety of patrons.

(2) Repeated similar negligent acts.

(3) Conviction of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the
 licenseholder, in which case, the records of conviction or a certified copy shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(4) Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements.

(b) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(c) Failure to comply with the rules governing health and safety adopted by the board and approved by the State Department of Public Health, for the regulation of establishments, or any practice licensed and regulated under this chapter.

(d) Failure to comply with the rules adopted by the board for the regulation of establishments, or any practice licensed and regulated under this chapter.

(e) Continued practice by a person knowingly having an infectious or contagious disease.

(f) Habitual drunkenness, habitual use of or addiction to the use of any controlled substance.

(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain practice in any occupation licensed and regulated under this chapter, or money, or compensation in any form, by fraudulent misrepresentation.

(h) Failure to display the license or health and safety rules and regulations in a conspicuous place.

(i) Engaging, outside of a licensed establishment and for compensation in any form whatever, in any practice for which a license is required
 under this chapter, except that when the service is provided because of illness or other physical or mental incapacitation of the recipient of the service and when performed by a licensee obtained for the purpose from a licensed establishment.

(j) Permitting a license to be used where the holder is not personally, actively, and continuously engaged in business.

(k) The making of any false statement as to a material matter in any oath or affidavit, which is required by the provisions of this chapter.

(l) Refusal to permit or interference with an inspection authorized under this chapter.

(m) Any action or conduct which would have warranted the denial
 of a license.

(n) Failure to surrender a license that was issued in error or by
 mistake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 29.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.1.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation violating this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor unless a specific penalty is otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7405.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Administrative Fines and Citations [7406. - 7414.]

7406.

In addition to the authority to conduct disciplinary proceedings under this chapter, the board, through its duly authorized representatives, shall have authority to assess administrative fines for the violation of any section of this chapter or the violation of any rules and regulations adopted by the board under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7407.

The board shall establish by regulation a schedule of administrative fines for violations of this chapter that directly impact consumer safety. All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the board’s contingent fund.

The schedule shall indicate for each type of violation whether, in the board’s discretion, the violation can be corrected. The board shall ensure that it and the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education do not issue citations for the same violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 28.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7407.1.

(a) The board shall determine by regulation when a fine shall be assessed to both the holder of the establishment license and the individual licensee for the same violation. The board shall also determine by regulation when a fine shall be assessed to only the holder of the establishment license or to only an individual licensee for the same violation. In making these determinations, the board shall consider the egregiousness of the violation of the health and safety regulations and whether the violation is a repeated violation by licensees within the same establishment.

(b) (1) The board shall establish by regulation a board-offered remedial education program, in lieu of a first offense of a health and safety violation.

(2) The board may impose a fee to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of administering the program described in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7408.

The board, through its duly authorized representatives, shall issue a citation with respect to any violation for which an administrative fine may be assessed. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the specific provision alleged to have been violated. The administrative fine, if any, shall attach at the time the citation is written. The citation shall include an order to correct any condition or violation which lends itself to correction, as determined by the board pursuant to Section 7406.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7408.1.

The board may enter into a payment plan for citations with administrative fines that exceed five hundred dollars ($500). The board shall define by regulation the parameters of the payment plan, which shall include, but shall not be not limited to, the terms of the plan and grounds for cancellation of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 233, Sec. 2.   (SB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7409.

Any licensee served with a citation may avoid the payment of the associated administrative fine by presentation of written proof satisfactory to the board, or its executive officer, that the violation has been corrected. This provision applies only to a licensee’s first violation in any three-year period of any single provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Proof of correction shall be presented to the board, through its executive officer, in a time and manner prescribed by the board. The board may, in its discretion, extend for a reasonable period the time within which to correct the violation upon the showing of good cause. Notices of correction filed after the prescribed date shall not be acceptable and the administrative fine shall be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7410.

Persons to whom a notice of violation or a citation is issued and an administrative fine assessed may appeal the citation to a disciplinary review committee established by the board. All appeals shall be submitted in writing to the program within 30 days of the date the citation was issued. Appeals of citations that are not submitted in a timely manner shall be rejected.

After a timely appeal has been filed with the program, the administrative fine, if any, shall be stayed until the appeal has been adjudicated.

Persons appealing a citation, or their appointed representatives, may appear in person before the disciplinary review committee. The appellant may present written or oral
 evidence relating to the facts and circumstances relating to the citation that was issued. Following an appeal to a disciplinary review committee, the disciplinary review committee shall issue a decision, based on findings of fact, which may affirm, reduce, dismiss, or alter any charges filed in the citation. In no event shall the administrative fine be increased. The appellant shall be provided with a written copy of the disciplinary review committee’s decision relating to the appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 28.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7411.

Persons receiving a decision from a disciplinary review committee may appeal the decision by filing a written request, within 30 days after receipt of the decision, to the program administrator. Following a hearing to appeal the decision of a disciplinary review committee, the director shall thereafter issue a decision, based on findings of fact, affirming, modifying or vacating the citation or penalty, or directing other appropriate relief. In no event shall the administrative fine be increased. The hearing to contest the decision of a disciplinary review committee shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7413.

Appeals of citations not filed in a timely manner or failure of the appellant or the appellant’s representative to appear before the disciplinary review committee at the appointed time except when good cause is shown, shall cause the citation to become final and there shall be no administrative appeal except as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.

The issuance of a license to, or the renewal of a license of, a person who fails to pay administrative fines that were not contested or that were contested but the appeal has been adjudicated may be made contingent upon
 all fines 
 being paid in addition to any application, renewal, or delinquency fees which are required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 233, Sec. 3.   (SB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.5. Tanning Facilities [7414.1. - 7414.6.]

7414.1.

All records required by law to be kept by tanning facilities subject to the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988 (Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 22700) of Division 8), including, but not limited to, records relating to written warning statements, the sign required to be posted, the qualifications of facility operators, statements of acknowledgment, parental consent forms, and injury reports, shall be open to inspection by the board, or its authorized representatives, during any inspection, or during any investigation initiated in response to a complaint that the tanning facility has violated any provision of the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988. A copy of any or all of those records shall be provided to the board, or its authorized representatives, immediately upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988 (Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 22700) of Division 8), is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code when:

(1) A complaint or a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code is filed in court charging the offense as an infraction, or

(2) The court, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecution, determines that the offense is an infraction in which event the case shall proceed as if the defendant has been arraigned on an infraction complaint.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of any of the provisions of the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988, which is an infraction, is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) This section shall become effective July 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section operative July 1, 1994, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.3.

(a) Any representative of the board designated by the director shall have the authority to issue a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. Representatives so designated are not peace officers and are not entitled to safety member retirement benefits, as a result of that designation. Except as otherwise provided, the representative’s authority is limited to the issuance of written notices to appear for infraction violations of the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988 and only when the violation is committed in the presence of the representative.

(b) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any representative, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) and within the scope of his or her authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest which is lawful or which the representative, at the time of that arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful.

(c) This section shall become effective July 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.4.

The board, and its authorized representatives, may disseminate information to tanning facilities regarding compliance with the Filante Tanning Facility Act of 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.5.

This article shall be applicable only to those tanning facilities operated in conjunction with, or at the same location as, an establishment licensed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.6.

The board may adopt regulations concerning the operation of tanning facilities in licensed establishments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Revenue [7415. - 7426.5.]

7415.

Licenses issued under this chapter, unless specifically excepted, shall be issued for a two-year period and shall expire at midnight on the last day of the month of issuance by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7417.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a license that has expired for failure of the licensee to renew within the time fixed by this article may be renewed at any time within five years following its expiration upon application and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees and delinquency fees. If the license is renewed after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee and meet current continuing education requirements, if applicable, prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall
 be effective on the date on which the application is filed, or on the date on which the accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever occurs last. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in this article which next occurs following the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 17.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7418.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a license which has not been renewed within five years following its expiration shall be deemed canceled and may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter. The holder of the canceled license may obtain a new license only by submitting an application, paying all required fees, and qualifying for and passing the examination that would be required if the holder were applying for the license for the first time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7419.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed by the licensee as provided in this article, but that renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7420.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but may not be renewed. If it is reinstated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the current renewal fee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7421.

The fees shall be set by the board, within the limits set forth in this article, in amounts necessary to cover the expenses of the board in performing its duties under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7422.

All fees collected on behalf of the board and all receipts of every kind and nature, shall be reported to the Controller at the beginning of each month for the month preceding. At the same time the entire amount of collections shall be paid into the State Treasury, and shall be credited to the Barbering and Cosmetology Contingent Fund, which fund is hereby created.

The moneys in the contingent fund shall be appropriated to the board pursuant to the annual Budget Act and out of it shall be paid all salaries and all other
 expenses necessarily incurred in carrying into effect this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7423.

The amounts of the fees required by this chapter relating to licenses for individual practitioners are as follows:

(a) (1) Cosmetologist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(2) A cosmetologist initial license fee shall not be more than fifty dollars ($50).

(b) (1) An esthetician application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(2) An esthetician initial license fee shall not be more than forty dollars ($40).

(c) (1) A manicurist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(2) A manicurist initial license fee shall not be more than thirty-five dollars ($35).

(d) (1) A barber application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(2) A barber initial license fee shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(e) (1) An electrologist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(2) An electrologist initial license fee shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(f) An apprentice application and license fee shall be not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(g) The license renewal fee for individual practitioner licenses that are subject to renewal shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(h) A hairstylist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for
 developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.

(i) A hairstylist’s initial license fee shall be no more than fifty dollars ($50). 

(j) Notwithstanding Section 163.5 the license renewal delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 18.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7424.

The amounts of the fees payable under this chapter relating to licenses to operate an establishment are as follows:

(a) The application and initial license fee shall be not more than eighty dollars ($80).

(b) The renewal fee shall be not more than forty dollars ($40).

(c) The delinquency fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of renewal.

(d) Any application and initial license fee for the change of ownership of an existing establishment may be established by the board in an amount less than the fee prescribed for a new establishment, but sufficient to cover the costs of processing the application and issuing the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 213, Sec. 4.   Effective July 15, 1992.   Applicable from July 1, 1992, pursuant to Sec. 6 of Ch. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

7425.

The amounts of the fees payable under this chapter relating to licenses to operate a mobile unit are as follows:

(a) The application fee shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50). 

(b) The initial inspection and license fee shall not be more than one hundred dollars ($100). 

(c) The renewal fee shall be not more than forty dollars ($40). 

(d) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee
 in effect on the date of renewal, notwithstanding Section 163.5.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1172, Sec. 20.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 1172.)
-------------------------------------------

7426.

The fee for a duplicate license as provided for in Section 7398 shall be ten dollars ($10).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7426.5.

The board may, by regulation, divide the fees payable under this chapter relating to licenses into separate categories based upon processing functions, such as application review, examination administration, or license issuance, provided that the combined fees for those processing functions do not exceed the maximum amount prescribed by the license category.

The board may, by regulation, establish procedures whereby some or all of a fee submitted in connection with an application for licensure would be forfeited by an
 applicant who has withdrawn his or her application, fails to appear for an examination, or is required to retake an examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. App-Based Drivers and Services [7448. - 7467.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title, Findings and Declarations, and Statement of Purpose  [7448. - 7450.]

7448.

Title. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Protect App-Based Drivers and Services Act.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7449.

Findings and Declarations. The people of the State of California find and declare as follows:

(a) Hundreds of thousands of Californians are choosing to work as independent contractors in the modern economy using app-based rideshare and delivery platforms to transport passengers and deliver food, groceries, and other goods as a means of earning income while maintaining the flexibility to decide when, where, and how they work.

(b) These app-based rideshare and delivery drivers include parents who want to work flexible schedules while children are in school; students who want to earn money in between classes; retirees who rideshare or deliver a few hours a week to supplement fixed incomes and for social
 interaction; military spouses and partners who frequently relocate; and families struggling with California’s high cost of living that need to earn extra income.

(c) Millions of California consumers and businesses, and our state’s economy as a whole, also benefit from the services of people who work as independent contractors using app-based rideshare and delivery platforms. App-based rideshare and delivery drivers are providing convenient and affordable transportation for the public, reducing impaired and drunk driving, improving mobility for seniors and individuals with disabilities, providing new transportation options for families who cannot afford a vehicle, and providing new affordable and convenient delivery options for grocery stores, restaurants, retailers, and other local businesses and their patrons.

(d) However, recent legislation has threatened to take away the
 flexible work opportunities of hundreds of thousands of Californians, potentially forcing them into set shifts and mandatory hours, taking away their ability to make their own decisions about the jobs they take and the hours they work.

(e) Protecting the ability of Californians to work as independent contractors throughout the state using app-based rideshare and delivery platforms is necessary so people can continue to choose which jobs they take, to work as often or as little as they like, and to work with multiple platforms or companies, all the while preserving access to app-based rideshare and delivery services that are beneficial to consumers, small businesses, and the California economy.

(f) App-based rideshare and delivery drivers deserve economic security. This chapter is necessary to protect their freedom to work independently, while also providing these workers new
 benefits and protections not available under current law. These benefits and protections include a healthcare subsidy consistent with the average contributions required under the Affordable Care Act (ACA); a new minimum earnings guarantee tied to 120 percent of minimum wage with no maximum; compensation for vehicle expenses; occupational accident insurance to cover on-the-job injuries; and protection against discrimination and sexual harassment.

(g) California law and rideshare and delivery network companies should protect the safety of both drivers and consumers without affecting the right of app-based rideshare and delivery drivers to work as independent contractors. Such protections should, at a minimum, include criminal background checks of drivers; zero tolerance policies for drug- and alcohol-related offenses; and driver safety training.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7450.

Statement of Purpose. The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) To protect the basic legal right of Californians to choose to work as independent contractors with rideshare and delivery network companies throughout the state.

(b) To protect the individual right of every app-based rideshare and delivery driver to have the flexibility to set their own hours for when, where, and how they work.

(c) To require rideshare and delivery network companies to offer new protections and benefits for app-based rideshare and delivery drivers, including minimum compensation levels, insurance to cover on-the-job injuries, automobile accident
 insurance, health care subsidies for qualifying drivers, protection against harassment and discrimination, and mandatory contractual rights and appeal processes.

(d) To improve public safety by requiring criminal background checks, driver safety training, and other safety provisions to help ensure app-based rideshare and delivery drivers do not pose a threat to customers or the public.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. App-Based Driver Independence  [7451. - 7452.5.]

7451.

Protecting Independence. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, the Labor Code, the Unemployment Insurance Code, and any orders, regulations, or opinions of the Department of Industrial Relations or any board, division, or commission within the Department of Industrial Relations, an app-based driver is an independent contractor and not an employee or agent with respect to the app-based driver’s relationship with a network company if the following conditions are met:

(a) The network company does not unilaterally prescribe specific dates, times of day, or a minimum number of hours during which the app-based driver must be logged into the network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(b) The network company does not require the app-based driver to accept any specific rideshare service or delivery service request as a condition of maintaining access to the network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(c) The network company does not restrict the app-based driver from performing rideshare services or delivery services through other network companies except during engaged time.

(d) The network company does not restrict the app-based driver from working in any other lawful occupation or business.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7452.

Contract and Termination Provisions. (a) A network company and an app-based driver shall enter into a written agreement prior to the driver receiving access to the network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(b) A network company shall not terminate a contract with an app-based driver unless based upon a ground specified in the contract.

(c) Network companies shall provide an appeals process for app-based drivers whose contracts are terminated by the network company.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7452.5.

Independence Unaffected. Nothing in Article 3 (commencing with Section 7453) to Article 11 (commencing with Section 7467), inclusive, of this chapter shall be interpreted to in any way alter the relationship between a network company and an app-based driver for whom the conditions set forth in Section 7451 are satisfied.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compensation [7453. - 7453.]

7453.

Earnings Guarantee. (a) A network company shall ensure that for each earnings period, an app-based driver is compensated at not less than the net earnings floor as set forth in this section. The net earnings floor establishes a guaranteed minimum level of compensation for app-based drivers that cannot be reduced. In no way does the net earnings floor prohibit app-based drivers from earning a higher level of compensation.

(b) For each earnings period, a network company shall compare an app-based driver’s net earnings against the net earnings floor for that app-based driver during the earnings period. In the event that the app-based driver’s net earnings in the earnings period are less than the net earnings floor for that earnings period, the
 network company shall include an additional sum accounting for the difference in the app-based driver’s earnings no later than during the next earnings period.
